Nebraska, session 109, LB560.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 81-3725, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-3725 (1) The commission shall develop a program to provide marketing
assistance grants to communities and organizations hosting national or
international-caliber events held in Nebraska that have the potential to
attract a significant percentage of out-of-state visitors and to generate
favorable national or international press coverage for Nebraska.
(2) A community or organization applying for a marketing assistance grant
shall provide a plan to the commission that includes: (a) Documentation that
the event will attract out-of-state visitors; (b) details regarding the type of
marketing that would be carried out with state funds; (c) methodologies used to
track the impact of marketing efforts and the number of out-of-state visitors
attending the event; and (d) details regarding the potential national or
international press coverage that will be generated by the event.
(3)(a) (3) The commission shall develop a program to provide innovative
tourism grants to communities or organizations that provide tourism and visitor
promotion services, host events, or promote attractions that which result in
either (i) (a) an increased number of nonlocal, instate visitors or (ii) (b) an
increased number of both nonlocal, instate visitors and out-of-state visitors.
Innovative tourism grants may include, but not be limited to, marketing
assistance, planning assistance, basic support, and regional cooperation.
Innovative tourism grants shall not be used for equipment or capital facility
development or improvements.
(b) When awarding innovative tourism grants under the program, the
commission shall award up to five hundred thousand dollars in innovative
tourism grants to any such city or village each fiscal year.
(4) The executive director shall convene a technical review committee of
no fewer than three individuals representing the public sector, the private
sector, and citizens at large. The technical review committee and the executive
director shall review and score applications for marketing assistance grants
and innovative tourism grants and forward recommendations to the commission for
approval by the commission or a subcommittee of the commission.
(5) Communities and organizations receiving marketing assistance grants or
innovative tourism grants authorized under this section shall provide a final
report to the commission within ninety days after the completion date of the
event that includes event attendance, the use of funds, and marketing impact
information.
(6) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
governing the grant programs authorized under this section.
Sec. 2. Original section 81-3725, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is repealed.
-1-